Illinois, session 104th, SB798.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3960/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1153)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)8    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Health care facilities" means and includes the following 10facilities, organizations, and related persons:11        (1) An ambulatory surgical treatment center required 12    to be licensed pursuant to the Ambulatory Surgical 13    Treatment Center Act.14        (2) An institution, place, building, or agency 15    required to be licensed pursuant to the Hospital Licensing 16    Act.17        (3) Skilled and intermediate long term care facilities 18    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act.19            (A) If a demonstration project under the Nursing 20        Home Care Act applies for a certificate of need to 21        convert to a nursing facility, it shall meet the 22        licensure and certificate of need requirements in 23        effect as of the date of application.  SB0798 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1            (B) Except as provided in item (A) of this 2        subsection, this Act does not apply to facilities 3        granted waivers under Section 3-102.2 of the Nursing 4        Home Care Act.5        (3.5) Skilled and intermediate care facilities 6    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD 7    Act. No permit or exemption is required for a facility 8    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD 9    Act prior to the reduction of the number of beds at a 10    facility. If there is a total reduction of beds at a 11    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or 12    the MC/DD Act, this is a discontinuation or closure of the 13    facility. If a facility licensed under the ID/DD Community 14    Care Act or the MC/DD Act reduces the number of beds or 15    discontinues the facility, that facility must notify the 16    Board as provided in Section 14.1 of this Act. 17        (3.7) Facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental 18    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013. 19        (4) Hospitals, nursing homes, ambulatory surgical 20    treatment centers, or kidney disease treatment centers 21    maintained by the State or any department or agency 22    thereof.23        (5) Kidney disease treatment centers, including a 24    free-standing hemodialysis unit required to meet the 25    requirements of 42 CFR 494 in order to be certified for 26    participation in Medicare and Medicaid under Titles XVIII   SB0798 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1    and XIX of the federal Social Security Act.2            (A) This Act does not apply to a dialysis facility 3        that provides only dialysis training, support, and 4        related services to individuals with end stage renal 5        disease who have elected to receive home dialysis.6            (B) This Act does not apply to a dialysis unit 7        located in a licensed nursing home that offers or 8        provides dialysis-related services to residents with 9        end stage renal disease who have elected to receive 10        home dialysis within the nursing home.11            (C) The Board, however, may require dialysis 12        facilities and licensed nursing homes under items (A) 13        and (B) of this subsection to report statistical 14        information on a quarterly basis to the Board to be 15        used by the Board to conduct analyses on the need for 16        proposed kidney disease treatment centers. 17        (6) An institution, place, building, or room used for 18    the performance of outpatient surgical procedures that is 19    leased, owned, or operated by or on behalf of an 20    out-of-state facility.21        (7) An institution, place, building, or room used for 22    provision of a health care category of service, including, 23    but not limited to, cardiac catheterization and open heart 24    surgery.25        (8) An institution, place, building, or room housing 26    major medical equipment used in the direct clinical   SB0798 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1    diagnosis or treatment of patients, and whose project cost 2    is in excess of the capital expenditure minimum. 3    "Health care facilities" does not include the following 4entities or facility transactions:5        (1) Federally-owned facilities.6        (2) Facilities used solely for healing by prayer or 7    spiritual means.8        (3) An existing facility located on any campus 9    facility as defined in Section 5-5.8b of the Illinois 10    Public Aid Code, provided that the campus facility 11    encompasses 30 or more contiguous acres and that the new 12    or renovated facility is intended for use by a licensed 13    residential facility.14        (4) Facilities licensed under the Supportive 15    Residences Licensing Act or the Assisted Living and Shared 16    Housing Act.17        (5) Facilities designated as supportive living 18    facilities that are in good standing with the program 19    established under Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public 20    Aid Code.21        (6) Facilities established and operating under the 22    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act as a children's 23    community-based health care center alternative health care 24    model demonstration program or as an Alzheimer's Disease 25    Management Center alternative health care model 26    demonstration program.  SB0798 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1        (7) The closure of an entity or a portion of an entity 2    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 3    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD 4    Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, with the exception 5    of facilities operated by a county or Illinois Veterans 6    Homes, that elect to convert, in whole or in part, to an 7    assisted living or shared housing establishment licensed 8    under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and with 9    the exception of a facility licensed under the Specialized 10    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013 in connection 11    with a proposal to close a facility and re-establish the 12    facility in another location.13        (8) Any change of ownership of a health care facility 14    that is licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 15    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 16    ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, with the 17    exception of facilities operated by a county or Illinois 18    Veterans Homes. Changes of ownership of facilities 19    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act must meet the 20    requirements set forth in Sections 3-101 through 3-119 of 21    the Nursing Home Care Act.22        (9) (Blank). 23    With the exception of those health care facilities 24specifically included in this Section, nothing in this Act 25shall be intended to include facilities operated as a part of 26the practice of a physician or other licensed health care   SB0798 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1professional, whether practicing in his individual capacity or 2within the legal structure of any partnership, medical or 3professional corporation, or unincorporated medical or 4professional group. Further, this Act shall not apply to 5physicians or other licensed health care professional's 6practices where such practices are carried out in a portion of 7a health care facility under contract with such health care 8facility by a physician or by other licensed health care 9professionals, whether practicing in his individual capacity 10or within the legal structure of any partnership, medical or 11professional corporation, or unincorporated medical or 12professional groups, unless the entity constructs, modifies, 13or establishes a health care facility as specifically defined 14in this Section. This Act shall apply to construction or 15modification and to establishment by such health care facility 16of such contracted portion which is subject to facility 17licensing requirements, irrespective of the party responsible 18for such action or attendant financial obligation. 19    "Person" means any one or more natural persons, legal 20entities, governmental bodies other than federal, or any 21combination thereof.22    "Consumer" means any person other than a person (a) whose 23major occupation currently involves or whose official capacity 24within the last 12 months has involved the providing, 25administering or financing of any type of health care 26facility, (b) who is engaged in health research or the   SB0798 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1teaching of health, (c) who has a material financial interest 2in any activity which involves the providing, administering or 3financing of any type of health care facility, or (d) who is or 4ever has been a member of the immediate family of the person 5defined by item (a), (b), or (c).6    "State Board" or "Board" means the Health Facilities and 7Services Review Board.8    "Construction or modification" means the establishment, 9erection, building, alteration, reconstruction, 10modernization, improvement, extension, discontinuation, 11change of ownership, of or by a health care facility, or the 12purchase or acquisition by or through a health care facility 13of equipment or service for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes 14or for facility administration or operation, or any capital 15expenditure made by or on behalf of a health care facility 16which exceeds the capital expenditure minimum; however, any 17capital expenditure made by or on behalf of a health care 18facility for (i) the construction or modification of a 19facility licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 20Act or (ii) a conversion project undertaken in accordance with 21Section 30 of the Older Adult Services Act shall be excluded 22from any obligations under this Act.23    "Establish" means the construction of a health care 24facility or the replacement of an existing facility on another 25site or the initiation of a category of service.26    "Major medical equipment" means medical equipment which is   SB0798 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1used for the provision of medical and other health services 2and which costs in excess of the capital expenditure minimum, 3except that such term does not include medical equipment 4acquired by or on behalf of a clinical laboratory to provide 5clinical laboratory services if the clinical laboratory is 6independent of a physician's office and a hospital and it has 7been determined under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act 8to meet the requirements of paragraphs (10) and (11) of 9Section 1861(s) of such Act. In determining whether medical 10equipment has a value in excess of the capital expenditure 11minimum, the value of studies, surveys, designs, plans, 12working drawings, specifications, and other activities 13essential to the acquisition of such equipment shall be 14included.15    "Capital expenditure" means an expenditure: (A) made by or 16on behalf of a health care facility (as such a facility is 17defined in this Act); and (B) which under generally accepted 18accounting principles is not properly chargeable as an expense 19of operation and maintenance, or is made to obtain by lease or 20comparable arrangement any facility or part thereof or any 21equipment for a facility or part; and which exceeds the 22capital expenditure minimum.23    For the purpose of this paragraph, the cost of any 24studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, 25specifications, and other activities essential to the 26acquisition, improvement, expansion, or replacement of any   SB0798 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1plant or equipment with respect to which an expenditure is 2made shall be included in determining if such expenditure 3exceeds the capital expenditures minimum. Unless otherwise 4interdependent, or submitted as one project by the applicant, 5components of construction or modification undertaken by means 6of a single construction contract or financed through the 7issuance of a single debt instrument shall not be grouped 8together as one project. Donations of equipment or facilities 9to a health care facility which if acquired directly by such 10facility would be subject to review under this Act shall be 11considered capital expenditures, and a transfer of equipment 12or facilities for less than fair market value shall be 13considered a capital expenditure for purposes of this Act if a 14transfer of the equipment or facilities at fair market value 15would be subject to review.16    "Capital expenditure minimum" means $11,500,000 for 17projects by hospital applicants, $6,500,000 for applicants for 18projects related to skilled and intermediate care long-term 19care facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, and 20$3,000,000 for projects by all other applicants, which shall 21be annually adjusted to reflect the increase in construction 22costs due to inflation, for major medical equipment and for 23all other capital expenditures.24    "Financial commitment" means the commitment of at least 2533% of total funds assigned to cover total project cost, which 26occurs by the actual expenditure of 33% or more of the total   SB0798 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1project cost or the commitment to expend 33% or more of the 2total project cost by signed contracts or other legal means. 3    "Non-clinical service area" means an area (i) for the 4benefit of the patients, visitors, staff, or employees of a 5health care facility and (ii) not directly related to the 6diagnosis, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons receiving 7services from the health care facility. "Non-clinical service 8areas" include, but are not limited to, chapels; gift shops; 9news stands; computer systems; tunnels, walkways, and 10elevators; telephone systems; projects to comply with life 11safety codes; educational facilities; components in a patient 12care unit used as educational space, consultation and 13touchdown rooms, and on-call rooms; student housing; patient, 14employee, staff, and visitor dining areas; administration and 15volunteer offices; modernization of structural components 16(such as roof replacement and masonry work); boiler repair or 17replacement; vehicle maintenance and storage facilities; 18parking facilities; mechanical systems for heating, 19ventilation, and air conditioning; loading docks; and repair 20or replacement of carpeting, tile, wall coverings, window 21coverings or treatments, or furniture. "Non-clinical service 22area" Solely for the purpose of this definition, "non-clinical 23service area" does not include health and fitness centers, 24areas in a patient care unit, or areas that are required by 25Department licensing standards, including life safety code 26regulations, such as hallways and other interdependent   SB0798 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1components to a clinical area.2    "Areawide" means a major area of the State delineated on a 3geographic, demographic, and functional basis for health 4planning and for health service and having within it one or 5more local areas for health planning and health service. The 6term "region", as contrasted with the term "subregion", and 7the word "area" may be used synonymously with the term 8"areawide".9    "Local" means a subarea of a delineated major area that on 10a geographic, demographic, and functional basis may be 11considered to be part of such major area. The term "subregion" 12may be used synonymously with the term "local".13    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice in 14accordance with the Medical Practice Act of 1987, as amended.15    "Licensed health care professional" means a person 16licensed to practice a health profession under pertinent 17licensing statutes of the State of Illinois.18    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 19of Public Health.20    "Agency" or "Department" means the Illinois Department of 21Public Health.22    "Alternative health care model" means a facility or 23program authorized under the Alternative Health Care Delivery 24Act.25    "Out-of-state facility" means a person that is both (i) 26licensed as a hospital or as an ambulatory surgery center   SB0798 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1under the laws of another state or that qualifies as a hospital 2or an ambulatory surgery center under regulations adopted 3pursuant to the Social Security Act and (ii) not licensed 4under the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act, the 5Hospital Licensing Act, or the Nursing Home Care Act. 6Affiliates of out-of-state facilities shall be considered 7out-of-state facilities. Affiliates of Illinois licensed 8health care facilities 100% owned by an Illinois licensed 9health care facility, its parent, or Illinois physicians 10licensed to practice medicine in all its branches shall not be 11considered out-of-state facilities. Nothing in this definition 12shall be construed to include an office or any part of an 13office of a physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 14branches in Illinois that is not required to be licensed under 15the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act.16    "Change of ownership of a health care facility" means a 17change in the person who has ownership or control of a health 18care facility's physical plant and capital assets. A change in 19ownership is indicated by the following transactions: sale, 20transfer, acquisition, lease, change of sponsorship, or other 21means of transferring control.22    "Related person" means any person that: (i) is at least 2350% owned, directly or indirectly, by either the health care 24facility or a person owning, directly or indirectly, at least 2550% of the health care facility; or (ii) owns, directly or 26indirectly, at least 50% of the health care facility.  SB0798 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1    "Charity care" means care provided by a health care 2facility for which the provider does not expect to receive 3payment from the patient or a third-party payer.4    "Freestanding emergency center" means a facility subject 5to licensure under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical 6Services (EMS) Systems Act.7    "Category of service" means a grouping by generic class of 8various types or levels of support functions, equipment, care, 9or treatment provided to patients or residents, including, but 10not limited to, classes such as medical-surgical, pediatrics, 11or cardiac catheterization. A category of service may include 12subcategories or levels of care that identify a particular 13degree or type of care within the category of service. Nothing 14in this definition shall be construed to include the practice 15of a physician or other licensed health care professional 16while functioning in an office providing for the care, 17diagnosis, or treatment of patients. A category of service 18that is subject to the Board's jurisdiction must be designated 19in rules adopted by the Board.20    "State Board Staff Report" means the document that sets 21forth the review and findings of the State Board staff, as 22prescribed by the State Board, regarding applications subject 23to Board jurisdiction. 24    "Patient care unit" means a physically identifiable and 25organized unit in a clearly defined administrative and 26geographic area that meets applicable standards of service in   SB0798 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07201 SPS 17238 b1which nursing care and therapeutic services are provided on a 2continuous basis and to which specific nursing and support 3staff are assigned. "Patient care unit" does not include 4education spaces, consultation and touchdown rooms, and 5on-call rooms that are not required by Department licensing 6standards.7    "Provider" includes, but is not limited to, a hospital, 8long-term care facility, end-stage renal dialysis facility, 9ambulatory surgical treatment center, freestanding emergency 10center, or birth center. 11(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 6-1-18; 100-581, eff. 3-12-18; 12100-957, eff. 8-19-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-650, eff. 137-7-20.)